Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-409
Class V school district; body corporate; powers.

Each incorporated city of the metropolitan class in the State of Nebraska shall contain at least one Class V school district. A Class V school district shall be a body corporate and possess all the usual powers of a corporation for public purposes and may sue and be sued, purchase, hold, and sell such personal and real property, and control such obligations as are authorized by law.

Laws 1891, c. 45, § 1, p. 317;

R.S.1913, § 7007;

C.S.1922, § 6638;

C.S.1929, § 79-2701;

R.S.1943, § 79-2701;

Laws 1947, c. 296, § 1, p. 910;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 248, p. 774;

Laws 1988, LB 1142, § 8;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1001;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 158;

Laws 2005, LB 126, § 15;

Laws 2006, LB 1024, § 23;

Referendum 2006, No. 422.